Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201079-1003
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities
Support Act:

(1) Adjusted general fund operating expenditures means (a)
for school fiscal years before school fiscal year 2007-08, general fund operating
expenditures as calculated pursuant to subdivision (21) of this section minus
the transportation allowance and minus the special receipts allowance, (b)
for school fiscal year 2007-08, general fund operating expenditures as calculated
pursuant to subdivision (21) of this section minus the sum of the transportation,
special receipts, and distance education and telecommunications allowances,
(c) for school fiscal year 2008-09, the difference of the product of the general
fund operating expenditures as calculated pursuant to subdivision (21) of
this section multiplied by the cost growth factor calculated pursuant to section
79-1007.10 minus the transportation allowance, special receipts allowance,
poverty allowance, limited English proficiency allowance, distance education
and telecommunications allowance, elementary site allowance, elementary class
size allowance, summer school allowance, and focus school and program allowance,
(d) for school fiscal year 2009-10, the difference of the product of the general
fund operating expenditures as calculated pursuant to subdivision (21) of
this section multiplied by the cost growth factor calculated pursuant to section
79-1007.10 minus the transportation allowance, special receipts allowance,
poverty allowance, limited English proficiency allowance, distance education
and telecommunications allowance, elementary site allowance, elementary class
size allowance, summer school allowance, instructional time allowance, and
focus school and program allowance, (e) for school fiscal years 2010-11 through
2012-13, the difference of the product of the general fund operating expenditures
as calculated pursuant to subdivision (21) of this section multiplied by the
cost growth factor calculated pursuant to section 79-1007.10 minus the transportation
allowance, special receipts allowance, poverty allowance, limited English
proficiency allowance, distance education and telecommunications allowance,
elementary site allowance, elementary class size allowance, summer school
allowance, instructional time allowance, teacher education allowance, and
focus school and program allowance, and (f) for school fiscal year 2013-14
and each school fiscal year thereafter, the difference of the product of the
general fund operating expenditures as calculated pursuant to subdivision
(21) of this section multiplied by the cost growth factor calculated pursuant
to section 79-1007.10 minus the transportation allowance, special receipts
allowance, poverty allowance, limited English proficiency allowance, distance
education and telecommunications allowance, elementary site allowance, summer
school allowance, instructional time allowance, teacher education allowance,
and focus school and program allowance;

(2) Adjusted valuation means the assessed valuation of taxable
property of each local system in the state, adjusted pursuant to the adjustment
factors described in section 79-1016. Adjusted valuation means the adjusted
valuation for the property tax year ending during the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year in which the aid based upon that value is
to be paid. For purposes of determining the local effort rate yield pursuant
to section 79-1015.01, adjusted valuation does not include the value of any
property which a court, by a final judgment from which no appeal is taken,
has declared to be nontaxable or exempt from taxation;

(3) Allocated income tax funds means the amount of assistance
paid to a local system pursuant to section 79-1005.01 or 79-1005.02 as adjusted
by the minimum levy adjustment pursuant to section 79-1008.02;

(4) Average daily attendance of a student who resides on Indian
land means average daily attendance of a student who resides on Indian land
from the most recent data available on November 1 preceding the school fiscal
year in which aid is to be paid;

(5) Average daily membership means the average daily membership
for grades kindergarten through twelve attributable to the local system, as
provided in each district's annual statistical summary, and includes the proportionate
share of students enrolled in a public school instructional program on less
than a full-time basis;

(6) Base fiscal year means the first school fiscal year following
the school fiscal year in which the reorganization or unification occurred;

(7) Board means the school board of each school district;

(8) Categorical funds means funds limited to a specific purpose
by federal or state law, including, but not limited to, Title I funds, Title
VI funds, federal vocational education funds, federal school lunch funds,
Indian education funds, Head Start funds, and funds from the Education Innovation
Fund;

(9) Consolidate means to voluntarily reduce the number of
school districts providing education to a grade group and does not include
dissolution pursuant to section 79-498;

(10) Department means the State Department of Education;

(11) District means any Class I, II, III, IV, V, or VI school
district and, beginning with
the calculation of state aid for school fiscal year 2011-12 and each school
fiscal year thereafter, a unified system as defined in section 79-4,108;

(12) Ensuing school fiscal year means the school fiscal year
following the current school fiscal year;

(13) Equalization aid means the amount of assistance calculated
to be paid to a local system pursuant to sections 79-1007.11 to 79-1007.23, 79-1007.25, 79-1008.01 to
79-1022, and 79-1022.02;

(14) Fall membership means the total membership in kindergarten
through grade twelve attributable to the local system as reported on the fall
school district membership reports for each district pursuant to section 79-528;

(15) Fiscal year means the state fiscal year which is the
period from July 1 to the following June 30;

(16) Formula students means:

(a) For school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2008-09,
(i) for state aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022, the sum of fall membership
from the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in
which the aid is to be paid, multiplied by the average ratio of average daily
membership to fall membership for the second school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid and the prior
two school fiscal years, plus qualified early childhood education fall membership
plus tuitioned students from the school fiscal year immediately preceding
the school fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid and (ii) for final calculation
of state aid pursuant to section 79-1065, the sum of average daily membership
plus qualified early childhood education average daily membership plus tuitioned
students from the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal
year in which the aid was paid; and

(b) For school fiscal year 2008-09 and each school fiscal
year thereafter, (i) for state aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022,
the sum of the product of fall membership from the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid multiplied
by the average ratio of average daily membership to fall membership for the
second school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in
which the aid is to be paid and the prior two school fiscal years plus sixty
percent of the qualified early childhood education fall membership plus tuitioned
students from the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal
year in which aid is to be paid minus the product of the number of students
enrolled in kindergarten that is not full-day kindergarten from the fall membership
multiplied by 0.5 and (ii) for final calculation of state aid pursuant to
section 79-1065, the sum of average daily membership plus sixty percent of
the qualified early childhood education average daily membership plus tuitioned
students minus the product of the number of students enrolled in kindergarten
that is not full-day kindergarten from the average daily membership multiplied
by 0.5 from the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal
year in which aid was paid;

(17) Free lunch and free milk student means a student who
qualified for free lunches or free milk from the most recent data available
on November 1 of the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal
year in which aid is to be paid;

(18) Full-day kindergarten means kindergarten offered by
a district for at least one thousand thirty-two instructional hours;

(19) General fund budget of expenditures means the total
budget of disbursements and transfers for general fund purposes as certified
in the budget statement adopted pursuant to the Nebraska Budget Act, except
that for purposes of the limitation imposed in section 79-1023 and the calculation
pursuant to subdivision (2) of section 79-1027.01, the general fund budget
of expenditures does not include any special grant funds, exclusive of local
matching funds, received by a district;

(20) General fund expenditures means all expenditures from
the general fund;

(21) General fund operating expenditures means:

(a) For state aid calculated for school fiscal years prior
to school fiscal year 2008-09, the total general fund expenditures minus
categorical funds, tuition paid, transportation fees paid to other districts,
adult education, summer school, community services, redemption of the principal
portion of general fund debt service, retirement incentive plans, staff development
assistance, and transfers from other funds into the general fund for the second
school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which aid
is to be paid as reported on the annual financial report prior to December
1 of the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in
which aid is to be paid;

(b) For state aid calculated for school fiscal year 2008-09,
as reported for the second school fiscal year immediately preceding the school
fiscal year in which aid is to be paid on the annual financial report submitted
prior to December 1 of the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school
fiscal year in which aid is to be paid, the total general fund expenditures
minus (i) the amount of all receipts to the general fund, to the extent that
such receipts are not included in local system formula resources, from early
childhood education tuition, summer school tuition, educational entities as
defined in section 79-1201.01 for providing distance education courses through
the Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council to such educational entities,
private foundations, individuals, associations, charitable organizations,
the textbook loan program authorized by section 79-734, and federal impact
aid, (ii) the amount of expenditures for categorical funds, tuition paid,
transportation fees paid to other districts, adult education, community services,
redemption of the principal portion of general fund debt service, retirement
incentive plans authorized by section 79-855, and staff development assistance
authorized by section 79-856, and (iii) the amount of any transfers from the
general fund to any bond fund and transfers from other funds into the general
fund;

(c) For state aid calculated for school fiscal year 2009-10,
as reported on the annual financial report for the second school fiscal year
immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid, the
total general fund expenditures minus (i) the amount of all receipts to the
general fund, to the extent that such receipts are not included in local system
formula resources, from early childhood education tuition, summer school tuition,
educational entities as defined in section 79-1201.01 for providing distance
education courses through the Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council
to such educational entities, private foundations, individuals, associations,
charitable organizations, the textbook loan program authorized by section
79-734, and federal impact aid, (ii) the amount of expenditures for categorical
funds, tuition paid, transportation fees paid to other districts, adult education,
community services, redemption of the principal portion of general fund debt
service, retirement incentive plans authorized by section 79-855, and staff
development assistance authorized by section 79-856, (iii) the amount of any
transfers from the general fund to any bond fund and transfers from other
funds into the general fund, and (iv) any legal expenses in excess of fifteen-hundredths
of one percent of the formula need for the school fiscal year in which the
expenses occurred; and

(d) For state aid calculated for school fiscal year 2010-11
and each school fiscal year thereafter, as reported on the annual financial
report for the second school fiscal year immediately preceding the school
fiscal year in which aid is to be paid, the total general fund expenditures
minus (i) the amount of all receipts to the general fund, to the extent that
such receipts are not included in local system formula resources, from early
childhood education tuition, summer school tuition, educational entities as
defined in section 79-1201.01 for providing distance education courses through
the Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council to such educational entities,
private foundations, individuals, associations, charitable organizations,
the textbook loan program authorized by section 79-734, federal impact aid,
and levy override elections pursuant to section 77-3444, (ii) the amount of
expenditures for categorical funds, tuition paid, transportation fees paid
to other districts, adult education, community services, redemption of the
principal portion of general fund debt service, retirement incentive plans
authorized by section 79-855, and staff development assistance authorized
by section 79-856, (iii) the amount of any transfers from the general fund
to any bond fund and transfers from other funds into the general fund, (iv)
any legal expenses in excess of fifteen-hundredths of one percent of the formula
need for the school fiscal year in which the expenses occurred, (v) expenditures
to pay for sums agreed to be paid by a school district to certificated employees
in exchange for a voluntary termination occurring prior to July 1, 2009, and
(vi)(A) expenditures in school fiscal years 2009-10 through 2013-14 to pay
for employer contributions pursuant to subsection (2) of section 79-958 to
the School Retirement System of the State of Nebraska to the extent that such
expenditures exceed the employer contributions under such subsection that
would have been made at a contribution rate of seven and thirty-five hundredths
percent or (B) expenditures in school fiscal years 2009-10 through 2013-14
to pay for school district contributions pursuant to subdivision (1)(c)(i)
of section 79-9,113 to the Class V School Employees Retirement System to the
extent that such expenditures exceed the school district contributions under
such subdivision that would have been made at a contribution rate of seven
and thirty-seven hundredths percent.

For purposes of this subdivision (21) of this section, receipts
from levy override elections shall equal ninety-nine percent of the difference
of the total general fund levy minus a levy of one dollar and five cents per
one hundred dollars of taxable valuation multiplied by the assessed valuation
for school districts that have voted pursuant to section 77-3444 to override
the maximum levy provided pursuant to section 77-3442;

(22) High school district means a school district providing
instruction in at least grades nine through twelve;

(23) Income tax liability means the amount of the reported
income tax liability for resident individuals pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 less all nonrefundable credits earned and refunds made;

(24) Income tax receipts means the amount of income tax collected
pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 less all nonrefundable credits
earned and refunds made;

(25) Limited English proficiency students means (a) for school
fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2009-10, the number of students with
limited English proficiency in a district from the most recent data available
on November 1 of the school fiscal year preceding the school fiscal year in
which aid is to be paid and (b) for school fiscal year 2009-10 and each school
fiscal year thereafter, the number of students with limited English proficiency
in a district from the most recent data available on November 1 of the school
fiscal year preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid plus
the difference of such students with limited English proficiency minus the
average number of limited English proficiency students for such district,
prior to such addition, for the three immediately preceding school fiscal
years if such difference is greater than zero;

(26) Local system means a learning community for purposes
of calculation of state aid for the second full school fiscal year after becoming
a learning community and each school fiscal year thereafter, a unified system,
a Class VI district and the associated Class I districts, or a Class II, III,
IV, or V district and any affiliated Class I districts or portions of Class
I districts. The membership, expenditures, and resources of Class I districts
that are affiliated with multiple high school districts will be attributed
to local systems based on the percent of the Class I valuation that is affiliated
with each high school district;

(27) Low-income child means (a) for school fiscal years prior
to 2008-09, a child under nineteen years of age living in a household having
an annual adjusted gross income of fifteen thousand dollars or less for the
second calendar year preceding the beginning of the school fiscal year for
which aid is being calculated and (b) for school fiscal year 2008-09 and each
school fiscal year thereafter, a child under nineteen years of age living
in a household having an annual adjusted gross income for the second calendar
year preceding the beginning of the school fiscal year for which aid is being
calculated equal to or less than the maximum household income that would allow
a student from a family of four people to be a free lunch and free milk student
during the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year
for which aid is being calculated;

(28) Low-income students means the number of low-income children
within the district multiplied by the ratio of the formula students in the
district divided by the total children under nineteen years of age residing
in the district as derived from income tax information;

(29) Most recently available complete data year means the
most recent single school fiscal year for which the annual financial report,
fall school district membership report, annual statistical summary, Nebraska
income tax liability by school district for the calendar year in which the
majority of the school fiscal year falls, and adjusted valuation data are
available;

(30) Poverty students means (a) for school fiscal years prior
to school fiscal year 2009-10, the number of low-income students or the number
of students who are free lunch and free milk students in a district, whichever
is greater, and (b) for school fiscal year 2009-10 and each school fiscal
year thereafter, the number of low-income students or the number of students
who are free lunch and free milk students in a district plus the difference
of the number of low-income students or the number of students who are free
lunch and free milk students in a district, whichever is greater, minus the
average number of poverty students for such district, prior to such addition,
for the three immediately preceding school fiscal years if such difference
is greater than zero;

(31) Qualified early childhood education average daily membership
means the product of the average daily membership for school fiscal year 2006-07
and each school fiscal year thereafter of students who will be eligible to
attend kindergarten the following school year and are enrolled in an early
childhood education program approved by the department pursuant to section
79-1103 for such school district for such school year multiplied by the ratio
of the actual instructional hours of the program divided by one thousand thirty-two
if: (a) The program is receiving a grant pursuant to such section for the
third year; (b) the program has already received grants pursuant to such section
for three years; or (c) the program has been approved pursuant to subsection
(5) of section 79-1103 for such school year and the two preceding school years,
including any such students in portions of any of such programs receiving
an expansion grant;

(32) Qualified early childhood education fall membership
means the product of membership on the last Friday in September 2006 and each
year thereafter of students who will be eligible to attend kindergarten the
following school year and are enrolled in an early childhood education program
approved by the department pursuant to section 79-1103 for such school district
for such school year multiplied by the ratio of the planned instructional
hours of the program divided by one thousand thirty-two if: (a) The program
is receiving a grant pursuant to such section for the third year; (b) the
program has already received grants pursuant to such section for three years;
or (c) the program has been approved pursuant to subsection (5) of section
79-1103 for such school year and the two preceding school years, including
any such students in portions of any of such programs receiving an expansion
grant;

(33) Regular route transportation means the transportation
of students on regularly scheduled daily routes to and from the attendance
center;

(34) Reorganized district means any district involved in
a consolidation and currently educating students following consolidation;

(35) School year or school fiscal year means the fiscal year
of a school district as defined in section 79-1091;

(36) Sparse local system means a local system that is not
a very sparse local system but which meets the following criteria:

(a)(i) Less than two students per square mile in the county
in which each high school is located, based on the school district census,
(ii) less than one formula student per square mile in the local system, and
(iii) more than ten miles between each high school attendance center and the
next closest high school attendance center on paved roads;

(b)(i) Less than one and one-half formula students per square
mile in the local system and (ii) more than fifteen miles between each high
school attendance center and the next closest high school attendance center
on paved roads;

(c)(i) Less than one and one-half formula students per square
mile in the local system and (ii) more than two hundred seventy-five square
miles in the local system; or

(d)(i) Less than two formula students per square mile in
the local system and (ii) the local system includes an area equal to ninety-five
percent or more of the square miles in the largest county in which a high
school attendance center is located in the local system;

(37) Special education means specially designed kindergarten
through grade twelve instruction pursuant to section 79-1125, and includes
special education transportation;

(38) Special grant funds means the budgeted receipts for
grants, including, but not limited to, Title I funds, Title VI funds, funds
from the Education Innovation Fund, reimbursements for wards of the court,
short-term borrowings including, but not limited to, registered warrants and
tax anticipation notes, interfund loans, insurance settlements, and reimbursements
to county government for previous overpayment. The state board shall approve
a listing of grants that qualify as special grant funds;

(39) State aid means the amount of assistance paid to a district
pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act;

(40) State board means the State Board of Education;

(41) State support means all funds provided to districts
by the State of Nebraska for the general fund support of elementary and secondary
education;

(42) Statewide average basic funding per formula student
means the statewide total basic funding for all districts divided by the statewide
total formula students for all districts;

(43) Statewide average general fund operating expenditures
per formula student means the statewide total general fund operating expenditures
for all districts divided by the statewide total formula students for all
districts;

(44) Teacher has the definition found in section 79-101;

(45) Temporary aid adjustment factor means (a) for school
fiscal years before school fiscal year 2007-08, one and one-fourth percent
of the sum of the local system's transportation allowance, the local system's
special receipts allowance, and the product of the local system's adjusted
formula students multiplied by the average formula cost per student in the
local system's cost grouping and (b) for school fiscal year 2007-08, one and
one-fourth percent of the sum of the local system's transportation allowance,
special receipts allowance, and distance education and telecommunications
allowance and the product of the local system's adjusted formula students
multiplied by the average formula cost per student in the local system's cost
grouping;

(46) Tuitioned students means students in kindergarten through
grade twelve of the district whose tuition is paid by the district to some
other district or education agency; and

(47) Very sparse local system means a local system that has:

(a)(i) Less than one-half student per square mile in each
county in which each high school attendance center is located based on the
school district census, (ii) less than one formula student per square mile
in the local system, and (iii) more than fifteen miles between the high school
attendance center and the next closest high school attendance center on paved
roads; or

(b)(i) More than four hundred fifty square miles in the local
system, (ii) less than one-half student per square mile in the local system,
and (iii) more than fifteen miles between each high school attendance center
and the next closest high school attendance center on paved roads.

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 71;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 76;

Laws 1994, LB 1290, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 840, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3803;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 654;

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 29;

Laws 1997, LB 710, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 713, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 31;

Laws 1998, LB 306, § 42;

Laws 1998, LB 1134, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 1219, § 15;

Laws 1998, LB 1229, § 3;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 15;

Laws 1999, LB 149, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 19;

Laws 2001, LB 313, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 18;

Laws 2001, LB 833, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 898, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 45;

Laws 2005, LB 577, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 73;

Laws 2006, LB 1208, § 4;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 13;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 26;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB5, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 12.
July 15, 2010
Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.